West Virginia, session 2026, HB4200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Department of Administration. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 22, 2025, authorized under the authority of §5A-13-6 of this code, modified by the Department of Administration to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 23, 2025, relating to the Department of Administration (One-Stop Shop Permitting Program, 148 CSR 25), is authorized.